New York, session 2025-2026, S9831.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Christopher Walser, employed by the village of Chittenango, in 5 the county of Madison, as a part-time police officer, shall be eligible 6 to take the competitive civil service examination for the position of 7 police officer and shall, contingent upon his score on such examination, 8 be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for appointment as a full- 9 time police officer with the village of Chittenango police department. 10 § 2. Christopher Walser shall otherwise be subject to the merit and 11 fitness provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time 12 police officers. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15477-01-6